District of Columbia statutes.
9-1113.07

Authority of Comptroller General.

The Comptroller General of the United States shall have access to all books, records, papers, and accounts and operations of the Transit Authority, and any company with which the Transit Authority is conducting negotiations under this subchapter, and any company eligible to receive or receiving any funds authorized by this subchapter. The Comptroller General is authorized to inspect any facility or real or personal property of the Transit Authority or of such companies.

Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1004, Pub. L. 92-517, title V, § 501
1981 Ed., § 1-2477.
1973 Ed., § 1-1467.